Washington statutes.
RCW 35.07.240

Involuntary dissolution of towns—Notice of hearing.

Upon the filing of a petition for the involuntary dissolution of a town, the superior court shall enter an order fixing the time for hearing thereon at a date not less than thirty days from date of filing. The state auditor shall give notice of the hearing by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county, once a week for three successive weeks, and by posting in three public places in the town, stating therein the purpose of the petition and the date and place of hearing thereon.

[ 1985 c 469 s 18; 1965 c 7 s 35.07.240. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 76 s 2; RRS s 8931-2.]